Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-336
Local truck, defined.

Local truck means a truck and combinations of trucks, truck-tractors, or trailers operated solely within an incorporated city or village or within ten miles of the corporate limits of the city or village in which they are owned, operated, and registered.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 36.